test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-miiez_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mīez: # Noun 166 'eng /est mees/fin' - full paradigm
     mīez+N+Sg+Nom: mīez
     mīez+N+Sg+Gen: [mīʼe, mīe]
     mīez+N+Sg+Par: mīeztõ
     mīez+N+Sg+Dat: [mīʼen, mīen]
     mīez+N+Sg+Ins: [mīʼekõks, mīekõks]
     mīez+N+Sg+Ill: [mīʼezõ, mīezõ]
     mīez+N+Sg+Ela: [mīʼestõ, mīestõ]
     mīez+N+Pl+Nom: [mīʼed, mīed]
     mīez+N+Pl+Gen: [mīʼed, mīed]
     mīez+N+Pl+Par: [mēʼḑi, mēḑi]
     mīez+N+Pl+Dat: [mīʼedõn, mīedõn]
     mīez+N+Pl+Ins: [mīʼedkõks, mīedkõks]
     mīez+N+Pl+Ill: [mēʼži, mēži]
     mīez+N+Pl+Ela: [mēʼšti, mēšti]
